Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.250

Special assessments—Legislative authority may stop—Exceptions.

Except when lake or beach management district bonds are outstanding or when an existing contract might otherwise be impaired, the county legislative authority may stop the imposition of annual special assessments if, in its opinion, the public interest will be served by such action.

[ 2014 c 85 s 6; 1985 c 398 s 25.]